Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-224
Constitutional convention; delegates; incumbent of public office not disqualified.

Incumbency of any other public office, either elective or appointive, shall not disqualify the person holding the same from being a member of the constitutional convention.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 13, p. 552.